District of Columbia statutes.
1-622.07

Group insurance; amounts.

(a)

The group life insurance amounts purchased by the District under § 1-622.05 shall be no less than the insurance amounts provided under the Federal Employees Group Life Insurance (“F.E.G.L.I.”) plan pursuant to 5 U.S.C. § 8702, in effect as of October 1, 1987.

(b)

Employees shall be offered the option of purchasing additional coverage for themselves, and for their spouses and dependent children, and the cost of the additional coverage shall be borne solely by the employees purchasing that coverage, except Executive Service employees.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2207
as added Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-27, § 2(f), 34 DCR 5079
June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(w)(1), 45 DCR 2464

For actual amounts under the Federal Employees Group Life Insurance plan referred to in (a), see 5 U.S.C. § 8704.

Applicability of § 101(w) of D.C. Law 12-124: Section 401(c) of D.C. Law 12-124, as amended by § 60 of D.C. Law 12-264, provided that § 101(h), (l), (m), (n), (o)(2) through (5), (q), (r), (t), (u), (w), and (y) of the act shall apply as of October 21, 1998.

1981 Ed., § 1-623.7.
This section is referenced in § 1-622.03 and § 1-622.05.